Wyoming, session 2025, HB0056.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-1-612 is created to read:

15-1-612. Required notice for proposed zoning
changes.

Cities and towns shall send notice, by mail, to all
landowners within a zoning district or area that will be
subject to any zoning change and to all landowners within
HB0056

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0528
one thousand (1,000) feet of the affected zoning district
or area. For purposes of this section, "zoning change"
includes the creation of zoning requirements, conditional
use approvals, master plan amendments, zoning assignments,
zoning map amendments and zoning variances.

Section 2. This act shall apply to zoning change
applications filed on and after July 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0056